irish-lex.txt
Definitions
	Alphabet = %a|á|b|c|d|e|é|f|g|h|i|í|l|m|n|o|ó|p|r|s|t|u|ú|v ;

LEXICON Neg
	+V+Neg:0			#;

LEXICON VSuffix
	+V+Inf+:0		Neg;
	+V+Past+:0		Neg;
	+V+Pres+:eann   Neg;
	+V+Fut+:fidh	Neg;
	+V+Cond+:feadh  Neg;
